Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 13 Radiation Control
31-13-16.
Authorization to remedy violation by conference, conciliation, or persuasion; order to undertake corrective action.

Whenever the director has reason to believe that a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this chapter has occurred, he shall attempt to obtain a remedy with the violator or violators by conference, conciliation, or persuasion.
In the case of failure of such conference, conciliation, or persuasion to effect a remedy to such violation, the director may issue an order directed to such violator or violators.
The order shall specify the provisions of this chapter or rule or regulation alleged to have been violated and shall order that necessary corrective action be taken within a reasonable time to be prescribed in such order.
Any order issued by the director under this chapter shall be signed by the director.
Any such order shall become final unless the person or persons named therein request in writing a hearing before the director no later than 30 days after such order is served on such person or persons.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-17.
Declaration of existence of emergency.

Whenever the director finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health, safety, or well-being, the director, with the concurrence of the Governor, may issue an order declaring the existence of such an emergency and requiring that such action be taken to meet the emergency as the director specifies.
Such order shall be effective immediately.
Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately, but on application to the director shall be afforded a hearing within 48 hours.
On the basis of such hearing, the director may continue such order in effect, revoke it, or modify it.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-18.
Hearing on order or notice of action.

Whenever a person is aggrieved or adversely affected by any action or by any order or orders of the director, such person may request and obtain a hearing by filing a petition with the director within 30 days after service of the order or notice of action.
Such hearing and any other hearing under this chapter shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-19.
Judicial review.

Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available before the director and who is aggrieved by a final order or action in a contested case is entitled to judicial review under this chapter.
In this connection, all proceedings for judicial review shall be conducted in accordance with subsections (b) through (h) of Code Section 50-13-19, and any party to the proceeding may secure a review of the final judgment of the superior court by appeal in the manner and form provided by law for appeals from the superior courts to the appellate courts of this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-20.
Filing certified copy of unappealed final order or affirmed order.

The director may file in the superior court of the county wherein the person under order resides or, if such person is a corporation, in the county wherein the corporation maintains its principal place of business or, in any case, in the county wherein the violation occurred or in which jurisdiction is appropriate a certified copy of an unappealed final order of the director or of a final order of the director affirmed upon appeal whereupon such court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties.
Such judgment shall have the same effect and all proceedings in relation thereto shall thereafter be the same as though such judgment had been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by such court.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-21.
Temporary or permanent injunction; restraining order.

Whenever, in the judgment of the director, any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or will constitute any violation of this chapter, the director may apply to the superior court of the county where such person resides or, if such person is a nonresident of the state, to the superior court of the county where such person is engaged in or is about to engage in such act or practice for an order restraining and enjoining such act or practice. Upon a showing by the director that such person has engaged in or is about to engage in any such act or practice, a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining order, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing lack of an adequate remedy at law.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

31-13-22.
Representation of director in actions.

It shall be the duty of the Attorney General or his representative to represent the director in all actions in connection with this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, this Code section, which was inadvertently designated as Code Section 33-13-22 in Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1, was renumbered as Code Section 31-13-22.

31-13-23.
Transfer of powers and duties between Department of Natural Resources and Department of Community Health.

The Governor shall have the authority to transfer powers and duties enumerated in this chapter between the Department of Natural Resources and the Department of Community Health as he deems appropriate by executive order.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

31-13-24.
Effect on proceedings commenced before April 4, 1990; continuation of federal aid to agency receiving transfer of functions.

This chapter shall not affect the validity of any judicial or administrative proceeding pending or which was commenced before April 4, 1990, and any successor department shall be substituted as the proper party at interest. Furthermore, upon the transfer of any function under this chapter, the agency assuming the transfer and performing the function in the future shall be construed as a continuation of the original agency for the purpose of federal aid and may continue to receive any such funds to carry out or perform such functions.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-24

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “April 4, 1990” was substituted for “the effective date of the applicable provisions of this chapter” in the first sentence.

31-13-25.
Rules, regulations, agreements, and contracts formerly under Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Community Health for these purposes).

All rules and regulations, agreements, contracts, or other instruments which involve radioactive materials heretofore under the jurisdiction of the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Community Health for these purposes) will, by operation of law, be assumed by the Department of Natural Resources on April 4, 1990.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-13-25

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 711, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-38/HB 228.